Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1824.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6130. Covered bridge warning signs.(a) Identification of bridges.--(1) The department shall establish standards determining when a covered bridge, due to an uneven surface, poses a reasonable safety risk to pedalcycles and motorcycles. When determining the standards, an uneven surface includes raised joints, gaps, depressions, loose planks or other irregularities that would likely cause loss of control by a pedalcycle and motorcycle.(2) Not later than 60 days after the effective date of this section, the department shall compile an itemized list of covered bridges, which list shall be organized by county 12345678910111213141516171819 and municipality, that meet the standards established by the department under paragraph (1). The department shall indicate whether each covered bridge on the list is owned by the department or a local authority and shall publish the list on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) The department shall, in accordance with the standards adopted under paragraph (1) and not less than once annually, remove or add covered bridges to the list required under paragraph (2) and update the list published on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Notification.--Not later than 60 days after publication of the list under subsection (a)(2) and subsequent placement of a covered bridge on the list under subsection (a)(3), the department shall notify a local authority of covered bridges owned by the local authority meeting the standards established by the department under subsection (a).(c) Signage.--The department shall adopt standards for the uniform design and conspicuous placement of signs providing advanced warning to pedalcycles and motorcycles entering a covered bridge that is contained in the list under subsection (a).(d) Required installation.--A covered bridge added to the list under subsection (a) shall have conspicuous signs placed at the entrances of the covered bridge as follows:(1) Not later than 60 days after publication of the list or subsequent placement of the covered bridge owned by the department on the list under subsection (a), the department shall install conspicuous signage placed at the entrances of the covered bridge in accordance with the standards adopted under subsection (c).20250HB1824PN2246 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Not later than 60 days after receipt of the notification under subsection (b), the local authority shall install conspicuous signage at the entrances of the covered bridge owned by the local authority in accordance with the standards adopted under subsection (c). The department may, in consultation with the local authority, extend the installation deadline established under this paragraph.(e) Removal.--(1) After removal of a covered bridge owned by the department from the list under subsection (a)(3), the department may remove the signage required by subsection (d).(2) Not later than 60 days after a covered bridge owned by a local authority is removed from the list under subsection (a)(3), the department shall notify the local authority. The local authority may remove the signage required by subsection (d) after receipt of the notification.(f) Costs.--(1) The department is responsible for costs associated with installation, maintenance and upkeep of signage required by subsection (d) and placed at a covered bridge owned by the department.(2) A local authority is responsible for costs associated with installation, maintenance and upkeep of signage required by subsection (d) and placed at a covered bridge owned by the local authority.(g) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "covered bridge" means a bridge that includes a timber structure supporting a deck surface that carries loads over an obstruction on a public roadway. The term does not include a bridge closed to vehicular traffic.20250HB1824PN2246 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1824PN2246 - 4 - 1